Illinois, session 104th, SB1643.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 15-172 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-172)7    Sec. 15-172. Low-Income Senior Citizens Assessment Freeze 8Homestead Exemption. 9    (a) This Section may be cited as the Low-Income Senior 10Citizens Assessment Freeze Homestead Exemption.11    (b) As used in this Section:12    "Applicant" means an individual who has filed an 13application under this Section.14    "Base amount" means the base year equalized assessed value 15of the residence plus the first year's equalized assessed 16value of any added improvements which increased the assessed 17value of the residence after the base year.18    "Base year" means the taxable year prior to the taxable 19year for which the applicant first qualifies and applies for 20the exemption provided that in the prior taxable year the 21property was improved with a permanent structure that was 22occupied as a residence by the applicant who was liable for 23paying real property taxes on the property and who was either   SB1643- 2 -LRB104 03826 HLH 13850 b1(i) an owner of record of the property or had legal or 2equitable interest in the property as evidenced by a written 3instrument or (ii) had a legal or equitable interest as a 4lessee in the parcel of property that was single family 5residence. If in any subsequent taxable year for which the 6applicant applies and qualifies for the exemption the 7equalized assessed value of the residence is less than the 8equalized assessed value in the existing base year (provided 9that such equalized assessed value is not based on an assessed 10value that results from a temporary irregularity in the 11property that reduces the assessed value for one or more 12taxable years), then that subsequent taxable year shall become 13the base year until a new base year is established under the 14terms of this paragraph. For taxable year 1999 only, the Chief 15County Assessment Officer shall review (i) all taxable years 16for which the applicant applied and qualified for the 17exemption and (ii) the existing base year. The assessment 18officer shall select as the new base year the year with the 19lowest equalized assessed value. An equalized assessed value 20that is based on an assessed value that results from a 21temporary irregularity in the property that reduces the 22assessed value for one or more taxable years shall not be 23considered the lowest equalized assessed value. The selected 24year shall be the base year for taxable year 1999 and 25thereafter until a new base year is established under the 26terms of this paragraph.  SB1643- 3 -LRB104 03826 HLH 13850 b1    "Chief County Assessment Officer" means the County 2Assessor or Supervisor of Assessments of the county in which 3the property is located.4    "Consumer Price Index-u" means means the index published 5by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States 6Department of Labor that measures the average change in prices 7of goods and services purchased by all urban consumers, United 8States city average, all items, 1982-84=100. 9    "Equalized assessed value" means the assessed value as 10equalized by the Illinois Department of Revenue.11    "Household" means the applicant, the spouse of the 12applicant, and all persons using the residence of the 13applicant as their principal place of residence.14    "Household income" means the combined income of the 15members of a household for the calendar year preceding the 16taxable year.17    "Income" has the same meaning as provided in Section 3.07 18of the Senior Citizens and Persons with Disabilities Property 19Tax Relief Act, except that, beginning in assessment year 202001, "income" does not include veteran's benefits.21    "Internal Revenue Code of 1986" means the United States 22Internal Revenue Code of 1986 or any successor law or laws 23relating to federal income taxes in effect for the year 24preceding the taxable year.25    "Life care facility that qualifies as a cooperative" means 26a facility as defined in Section 2 of the Life Care Facilities   SB1643- 4 -LRB104 03826 HLH 13850 b1Act.2    "Maximum income limitation" means:3        (1) $35,000 prior to taxable year 1999;4        (2) $40,000 in taxable years 1999 through 2003;5        (3) $45,000 in taxable years 2004 through 2005;6        (4) $50,000 in taxable years 2006 and 2007;7        (5) $55,000 in taxable years 2008 through 2016; 8        (6) for taxable year 2017, (i) $65,000 for qualified 9    property located in a county with 3,000,000 or more 10    inhabitants and (ii) $55,000 for qualified property 11    located in a county with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants; 12    and 13        (7) for taxable years 2018 through 2024 and 14    thereafter, $65,000 for all qualified property; and . 15        (8) for taxable years 2025 and thereafter, the maximum 16    income limitation for the immediately preceding taxable 17    year, multiplied by one plus the percentage increase, if 18    any, in the Consumer Price Index-u for the 12-month period 19    ending in September of the calendar year immediately 20    preceding the taxable year for which the limitation is 21    calculated. 22    As an alternative income valuation, a homeowner who is 23enrolled in any of the following programs may be presumed to 24have household income that does not exceed the maximum income 25limitation for that tax year as required by this Section: Aid 26to the Aged, Blind or Disabled (AABD) Program or the   SB1643- 5 -LRB104 03826 HLH 13850 b1Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP), both of 2which are administered by the Department of Human Services; 3the Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP), which 4is administered by the Department of Commerce and Economic 5Opportunity; The Benefit Access program, which is administered 6by the Department on Aging; and the Senior Citizens Real 7Estate Tax Deferral Program. 8    A chief county assessment officer may indicate that he or 9she has verified an applicant's income eligibility for this 10exemption but may not report which program or programs, if 11any, enroll the applicant. Release of personal information 12submitted pursuant to this Section shall be deemed an 13unwarranted invasion of personal privacy under the Freedom of 14Information Act. 15    "Residence" means the principal dwelling place and 16appurtenant structures used for residential purposes in this 17State occupied on January 1 of the taxable year by a household 18and so much of the surrounding land, constituting the parcel 19upon which the dwelling place is situated, as is used for 20residential purposes. If the Chief County Assessment Officer 21has established a specific legal description for a portion of 22property constituting the residence, then that portion of 23property shall be deemed the residence for the purposes of 24this Section.25    "Taxable year" means the calendar year during which ad 26valorem property taxes payable in the next succeeding year are   SB1643- 6 -LRB104 03826 HLH 13850 b1levied.2    (c) Beginning in taxable year 1994, a low-income senior 3citizens assessment freeze homestead exemption is granted for 4real property that is improved with a permanent structure that 5is occupied as a residence by an applicant who (i) is 65 years 6of age or older during the taxable year, (ii) has a household 7income that does not exceed the maximum income limitation, 8(iii) is liable for paying real property taxes on the 9property, and (iv) is an owner of record of the property or has 10a legal or equitable interest in the property as evidenced by a 11written instrument. This homestead exemption shall also apply 12to a leasehold interest in a parcel of property improved with a 13permanent structure that is a single family residence that is 14occupied as a residence by a person who (i) is 65 years of age 15or older during the taxable year, (ii) has a household income 16that does not exceed the maximum income limitation, (iii) has 17a legal or equitable ownership interest in the property as 18lessee, and (iv) is liable for the payment of real property 19taxes on that property. 20    In counties of 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the amount 21of the exemption for all taxable years is the equalized 22assessed value of the residence in the taxable year for which 23application is made minus the base amount. In all other 24counties, the amount of the exemption is as follows: (i) 25through taxable year 2005 and for taxable year 2007 and 26thereafter, the amount of this exemption shall be the   SB1643- 7 -LRB104 03826 HLH 13850 b1equalized assessed value of the residence in the taxable year 2for which application is made minus the base amount; and (ii) 3for taxable year 2006, the amount of the exemption is as 4follows:5        (1) For an applicant who has a household income of 6    $45,000 or less, the amount of the exemption is the 7    equalized assessed value of the residence in the taxable 8    year for which application is made minus the base amount.9        (2) For an applicant who has a household income 10    exceeding $45,000 but not exceeding $46,250, the amount of 11    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the 12    residence in the taxable year for which application is 13    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.8.14        (3) For an applicant who has a household income 15    exceeding $46,250 but not exceeding $47,500, the amount of 16    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the 17    residence in the taxable year for which application is 18    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.6.19        (4) For an applicant who has a household income 20    exceeding $47,500 but not exceeding $48,750, the amount of 21    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the 22    residence in the taxable year for which application is 23    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.4.24        (5) For an applicant who has a household income 25    exceeding $48,750 but not exceeding $50,000, the amount of 26    the exemption is (i) the equalized assessed value of the   SB1643- 8 -LRB104 03826 HLH 13850 b1    residence in the taxable year for which application is 2    made minus the base amount (ii) multiplied by 0.2. 3    When the applicant is a surviving spouse of an applicant 4for a prior year for the same residence for which an exemption 5under this Section has been granted, the base year and base 6amount for that residence are the same as for the applicant for 7the prior year.8    Each year at the time the assessment books are certified 9to the County Clerk, the Board of Review or Board of Appeals 10shall give to the County Clerk a list of the assessed values of 11improvements on each parcel qualifying for this exemption that 12were added after the base year for this parcel and that 13increased the assessed value of the property.14    In the case of land improved with an apartment building 15owned and operated as a cooperative or a building that is a 16life care facility that qualifies as a cooperative, the 17maximum reduction from the equalized assessed value of the 18property is limited to the sum of the reductions calculated 19for each unit occupied as a residence by a person or persons 20(i) 65 years of age or older, (ii) with a household income that 21does not exceed the maximum income limitation, (iii) who is 22liable, by contract with the owner or owners of record, for 23paying real property taxes on the property, and (iv) who is an 24owner of record of a legal or equitable interest in the 25cooperative apartment building, other than a leasehold 26interest. In the instance of a cooperative where a homestead   SB1643- 9 -LRB104 03826 HLH 13850 b1exemption has been granted under this Section, the cooperative 2association or its management firm shall credit the savings 3resulting from that exemption only to the apportioned tax 4liability of the owner who qualified for the exemption. Any 5person who willfully refuses to credit that savings to an 6owner who qualifies for the exemption is guilty of a Class B 7misdemeanor.8    When a homestead exemption has been granted under this 9Section and an applicant then becomes a resident of a facility 10licensed under the Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act, the 11Nursing Home Care Act, the Specialized Mental Health 12Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the ID/DD Community Care Act, or 13the MC/DD Act, the exemption shall be granted in subsequent 14years so long as the residence (i) continues to be occupied by 15the qualified applicant's spouse or (ii) if remaining 16unoccupied, is still owned by the qualified applicant for the 17homestead exemption.18    Beginning January 1, 1997, when an individual dies who 19would have qualified for an exemption under this Section, and 20the surviving spouse does not independently qualify for this 21exemption because of age, the exemption under this Section 22shall be granted to the surviving spouse for the taxable year 23preceding and the taxable year of the death, provided that, 24except for age, the surviving spouse meets all other 25qualifications for the granting of this exemption for those 26years.  SB1643- 10 -LRB104 03826 HLH 13850 b1    When married persons maintain separate residences, the 2exemption provided for in this Section may be claimed by only 3one of such persons and for only one residence.4    For taxable year 1994 only, in counties having less than 53,000,000 inhabitants, to receive the exemption, a person 6shall submit an application by February 15, 1995 to the Chief 7County Assessment Officer of the county in which the property 8is located. In counties having 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, 9for taxable year 1994 and all subsequent taxable years, to 10receive the exemption, a person may submit an application to 11the Chief County Assessment Officer of the county in which the 12property is located during such period as may be specified by 13the Chief County Assessment Officer. The Chief County 14Assessment Officer in counties of 3,000,000 or more 15inhabitants shall annually give notice of the application 16period by mail or by publication. In counties having less than 173,000,000 inhabitants, beginning with taxable year 1995 and 18thereafter, to receive the exemption, a person shall submit an 19application by July 1 of each taxable year to the Chief County 20Assessment Officer of the county in which the property is 21located. A county may, by ordinance, establish a date for 22submission of applications that is different than July 1. The 23applicant shall submit with the application an affidavit of 24the applicant's total household income, age, marital status 25(and if married the name and address of the applicant's 26spouse, if known), and principal dwelling place of members of   SB1643- 11 -LRB104 03826 HLH 13850 b1the household on January 1 of the taxable year. The Department 2shall establish, by rule, a method for verifying the accuracy 3of affidavits filed by applicants under this Section, and the 4Chief County Assessment Officer may conduct audits of any 5taxpayer claiming an exemption under this Section to verify 6that the taxpayer is eligible to receive the exemption. Each 7application shall contain or be verified by a written 8declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury. A 9taxpayer's signing a fraudulent application under this Act is 10perjury, as defined in Section 32-2 of the Criminal Code of 112012. The applications shall be clearly marked as applications 12for the Low-Income Senior Citizens Assessment Freeze Homestead 13Exemption and must contain a notice that any taxpayer who 14receives the exemption is subject to an audit by the Chief 15County Assessment Officer.16    Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, in 17counties having fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants, if an 18applicant fails to file the application required by this 19Section in a timely manner and this failure to file is due to a 20mental or physical condition sufficiently severe so as to 21render the applicant incapable of filing the application in a 22timely manner, the Chief County Assessment Officer may extend 23the filing deadline for a period of 30 days after the applicant 24regains the capability to file the application, but in no case 25may the filing deadline be extended beyond 3 months of the 26original filing deadline. In order to receive the extension   SB1643- 12 -LRB104 03826 HLH 13850 b1provided in this paragraph, the applicant shall provide the 2Chief County Assessment Officer with a signed statement from 3the applicant's physician, advanced practice registered nurse, 4or physician assistant stating the nature and extent of the 5condition, that, in the physician's, advanced practice 6registered nurse's, or physician assistant's opinion, the 7condition was so severe that it rendered the applicant 8incapable of filing the application in a timely manner, and 9the date on which the applicant regained the capability to 10file the application.11    Beginning January 1, 1998, notwithstanding any other 12provision to the contrary, in counties having fewer than 133,000,000 inhabitants, if an applicant fails to file the 14application required by this Section in a timely manner and 15this failure to file is due to a mental or physical condition 16sufficiently severe so as to render the applicant incapable of 17filing the application in a timely manner, the Chief County 18Assessment Officer may extend the filing deadline for a period 19of 3 months. In order to receive the extension provided in this 20paragraph, the applicant shall provide the Chief County 21Assessment Officer with a signed statement from the 22applicant's physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or 23physician assistant stating the nature and extent of the 24condition, and that, in the physician's, advanced practice 25registered nurse's, or physician assistant's opinion, the 26condition was so severe that it rendered the applicant   SB1643- 13 -LRB104 03826 HLH 13850 b1incapable of filing the application in a timely manner.2    In counties having less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, if an 3applicant was denied an exemption in taxable year 1994 and the 4denial occurred due to an error on the part of an assessment 5official, or his or her agent or employee, then beginning in 6taxable year 1997 the applicant's base year, for purposes of 7determining the amount of the exemption, shall be 1993 rather 8than 1994. In addition, in taxable year 1997, the applicant's 9exemption shall also include an amount equal to (i) the amount 10of any exemption denied to the applicant in taxable year 1995 11as a result of using 1994, rather than 1993, as the base year, 12(ii) the amount of any exemption denied to the applicant in 13taxable year 1996 as a result of using 1994, rather than 1993, 14as the base year, and (iii) the amount of the exemption 15erroneously denied for taxable year 1994.16    For purposes of this Section, a person who will be 65 years 17of age during the current taxable year shall be eligible to 18apply for the homestead exemption during that taxable year. 19Application shall be made during the application period in 20effect for the county of his or her residence. 21    The Chief County Assessment Officer may determine the 22eligibility of a life care facility that qualifies as a 23cooperative to receive the benefits provided by this Section 24by use of an affidavit, application, visual inspection, 25questionnaire, or other reasonable method in order to insure 26that the tax savings resulting from the exemption are credited   SB1643- 14 -LRB104 03826 HLH 13850 b1by the management firm to the apportioned tax liability of 2each qualifying resident. The Chief County Assessment Officer 3may request reasonable proof that the management firm has so 4credited that exemption.5    Except as provided in this Section, all information 6received by the chief county assessment officer or the 7Department from applications filed under this Section, or from 8any investigation conducted under the provisions of this 9Section, shall be confidential, except for official purposes 10or pursuant to official procedures for collection of any State 11or local tax or enforcement of any civil or criminal penalty or 12sanction imposed by this Act or by any statute or ordinance 13imposing a State or local tax. Any person who divulges any such 14information in any manner, except in accordance with a proper 15judicial order, is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.16    Nothing contained in this Section shall prevent the 17Director or chief county assessment officer from publishing or 18making available reasonable statistics concerning the 19operation of the exemption contained in this Section in which 20the contents of claims are grouped into aggregates in such a 21way that information contained in any individual claim shall 22not be disclosed.23    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for taxable 24year 2017 and thereafter, in counties of 3,000,000 or more 25inhabitants, the amount of the exemption shall be the greater 26of (i) the amount of the exemption otherwise calculated under   SB1643- 15 -LRB104 03826 HLH 13850 b1this Section or (ii) $2,000. 2    (c-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 3chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 4the 2020 taxable year, without application, for any property 5that was approved for this exemption for the 2019 taxable 6year, provided that: 7        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as 8    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 9    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency; 10        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 11    1, 2020 is the same as the owner of record of the property 12    as of January 1, 2019; 13        (3) the exemption for the 2019 taxable year has not 14    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 15    this Code; and 16        (4) the applicant for the 2019 taxable year has not 17    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2019 or 2020 18    taxable years. 19    Nothing in this subsection shall preclude or impair the 20authority of a chief county assessment officer to conduct 21audits of any taxpayer claiming an exemption under this 22Section to verify that the taxpayer is eligible to receive the 23exemption as provided elsewhere in this Section. 24    (c-10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each 25chief county assessment officer may approve this exemption for 26the 2021 taxable year, without application, for any property   SB1643- 16 -LRB104 03826 HLH 13850 b1that was approved for this exemption for the 2020 taxable 2year, if:3        (1) the county board has declared a local disaster as 4    provided in the Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act 5    related to the COVID-19 public health emergency;6        (2) the owner of record of the property as of January 7    1, 2021 is the same as the owner of record of the property 8    as of January 1, 2020;9        (3) the exemption for the 2020 taxable year has not 10    been determined to be an erroneous exemption as defined by 11    this Code; and12        (4) the taxpayer for the 2020 taxable year has not 13    asked for the exemption to be removed for the 2020 or 2021 14    taxable years.15    Nothing in this subsection shall preclude or impair the 16authority of a chief county assessment officer to conduct 17audits of any taxpayer claiming an exemption under this 18Section to verify that the taxpayer is eligible to receive the 19exemption as provided elsewhere in this Section. 20    (d) Each Chief County Assessment Officer shall annually 21publish a notice of availability of the exemption provided 22under this Section. The notice shall be published at least 60 23days but no more than 75 days prior to the date on which the 24application must be submitted to the Chief County Assessment 25Officer of the county in which the property is located. The 26notice shall appear in a newspaper of general circulation in   SB1643- 17 -LRB104 03826 HLH 13850 b1the county.2    Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 8 of the State Mandates 3Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for the 4implementation of any mandate created by this Section. 5(Source: P.A. 101-635, eff. 6-5-20; 102-136, eff. 7-23-21; 6102-895, eff. 5-23-22.) 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.